apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="/be__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>be</l>        <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>was</l>       <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>was</l>       <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>were</l>      <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>been</l>      <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>being</l>     <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

    <!-- Below is content of 2nd definition of /be__vblex -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'m</l>        <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'re</l>       <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'s</l>        <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ha/ve__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/o__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oes</l>       <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>one</l>       <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oing</l>      <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accept__vblex">
<!--
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
-->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zig-zag__vblex"><e><par n="accept__vblex"/></e></pardef>


<pardef n="cost__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ed</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="found__vblex">
<!--
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
-->
<!-- evitu interpreti "found" cxi tie -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="capsi/ze__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ze</l>        <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ze</l>        <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zes</l>       <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zed</l>       <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zed</l>       <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zing</l>      <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="authori/se__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sed</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sed</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sing</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ze</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ze</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>zes</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>zed</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>zed</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>zing</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="liv/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="di/e__vblex"><e><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e></pardef>

<pardef n="d/ie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pa/y__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="be born">         <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>born</l><r><g><b/>born</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be known">        <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>known</l><r><g><b/>known</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be worth">        <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>worth</l><r><g><b/>worth</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be usefull">      <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>usefull</l><r><g><b/>usefull</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be hungry">       <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>hungry</l><r><g><b/>hungry</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="burst">           <i>burst</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cast">            <i>cast</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="connote">         <i>connot</i><par n="di/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cost">            <i>cost</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="covenant">        <i>covenant</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="do">              <i>d</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="do">              <i>d</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/><p><l><b/>so</l><r><g><b/>so</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="die">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demonstrate">     <i>demonstrat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deny">            <i>den</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dwindle">         <i>dwindl</i><par n="di/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grunt">           <i>grunt</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="have got">        <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/><p><l><b/>got</l><r><g><b/>got</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="have">            <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hurt">            <i>hurt</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="identify">        <i>identif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inquire">         <i>inquir</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intertwine">      <i>intertwin</i><par n="di/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lie">             <i>l</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lay">             <i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pay">             <i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="paralyse">        <i>paraly</i><par n="authori/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="poison">          <i>poison</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pre-empt">        <i>pre-empt</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pulverize">       <i>pulveriz</i><par n="di/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="re-enact">        <i>re-enact</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="re-establish">    <i>re-establish</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="read">            <i>read</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reintegrate">     <i>reintegrat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="say">             <i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="second-guess">    <i>second-guess</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="snipe">           <i>snip</i><par n="di/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="specify">         <i>specif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spoil">           <i>spoil</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tie">             <i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="there is">        <i>there<b/></i><par n="/be__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undo">            <i>und</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zig-zag">         <i>zig-zag</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="procure">       <i>procur</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bowdlerise">       <i>bowdleri</i><par n="authori/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="colonize">       <i>coloni</i><par n="capsi/ze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="familiarize">       <i>familiari</i><par n="capsi/ze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="internationalize">       <i>internationali</i><par n="capsi/ze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="moisturise">       <i>moisturi</i><par n="authori/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="palatalize">       <i>palatali</i><par n="capsi/ze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="putty">       <i>putt</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="underlie">       <i>underl</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wench">       <i>wench</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="digitalise">       <i>digitali</i><par n="authori/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unfreeze">       <i>unfree</i><par n="capsi/ze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vasectomize">       <i>vasectomi</i><par n="capsi/ze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swinge">       <i>swing</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="achromatise">       <i>achromati</i><par n="authori/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="company">       <i>compan</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="potter">       <i>potter</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
